Illinois, session 104th, SB3381.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Water Commission Act of 1985 is amended by 5changing Section 2 and by adding Sections 1.5, 4.6, 4.7, 4.8, 64.9, 4.10, 4.11, 4.12, and 4.13 as follows: 7    (70 ILCS 3720/1.5 new)8    Sec. 1.5. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    "Construction-manager-at-risk delivery method" means a 10delivery method in which the party proposing to be the 11construction manager commits to be responsible for performance 12of certain preconstruction services and, if the parties reach 13agreement on key terms, becomes responsible for construction 14of the project.15    "Design-build delivery method" means a delivery system 16that provides responsibility within a single contract for the 17furnishing of architecture, engineering, land surveying, and 18related services as required and the labor, materials, 19equipment, and other construction services for the project.20    "Design-build contract" means a contract for a public 21project under this Act between a commission and a design-build 22entity to furnish architecture, infrastructure, engineering, 23land surveying, public art or interpretive exhibits, and   SB3381 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1related services, as required, and the labor, materials, 2equipment, and other construction services for the project.3    "Design-build entity" means any individual, sole 4proprietorship, firm, partnership, joint venture, corporation, 5professional corporation, or other entity that proposes to 6design and construct any public project under this Act.7    "Design professional" means any individual, sole 8proprietorship, firm, partnership, joint venture, corporation, 9professional corporation, or other entity that offers services 10under the Illinois Architecture Practice Act of 1989, the 11Professional Engineering Practice Act of 1989, the Structural 12Engineering Practice Act of 1989, or the Illinois Professional 13Land Surveyor Act of 1989.14    "Evaluation criteria" means the requirements for the 15separate phases of the selection process as defined in this 16Act and may include the specialized experience, technical 17qualifications and competence, capacity to perform, past 18performance, experience with similar projects, assignment of 19personnel to the project, and other appropriate factors.20    "Proposal" means the offer to enter into a design-build 21contract as submitted by a design-build entity in accordance 22with this Act.23    "Request for proposal" means the document used by a 24commission to solicit proposals for a design-build contract.25    "Scope and performance criteria" means the requirements 26for the commission project, including, but not limited to, the   SB3381 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1intended usage, capacity, size, scope, quality and performance 2standards, life-cycle costs, and other programmatic criteria 3that are expressed in performance-oriented and quantifiable 4specifications and drawings that can be reasonably inferred 5and are suited to allow a design-build entity to develop a 6proposal.  7    (70 ILCS 3720/2)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 252)8    Sec. 2. The General Assembly hereby finds and declares 9that it is necessary and in the public interest to help assure 10a sufficient and economic supply of a source of water within 11those county wide areas of this State where, because of a 12growth in population and proximity to large urban centers, the 13health, safety and welfare of the residents is threatened by 14an ever increasing shortage of a continuing, available and 15adequate source and supply of water on an economically 16reasonable basis; however, it is not the intent of the General 17Assembly to interfere with the power of municipalities to 18provide for the retail distribution of water to their 19residents or the customers of their water systems. Therefore, 20in order to provide for a sufficient and economic supply of 21water to such areas, it is hereby declared to be the law of 22this State that:23    (a) With respect to any water commission constituted 24pursuant to Division 135 of the Illinois Municipal Code or 25established by operation of law under Public Act 83-1123, as   SB3381 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1amended, which water commission includes municipalities which 2in the aggregate have within their corporate limits more than 350% of the population of a county (hereinafter referred to as a 4"home county"), and such county is contiguous to a county 5which has a population in excess of 1,000,000 inhabitants, the 6provisions of this Act shall apply. With respect to any such 7water commission (hereinafter referred to as a "county water 8commission"): 9        (i) the terms of all commissioners of such commission 10    holding office at the time a water commission becomes a 11    county water commission shall terminate 30 days after such 12    time and new commissioners shall be appointed as the 13    governing board of the county water commission as 14    hereinafter provided in subsection (c); and 15        (ii) the county water commission shall continue to be 16    a body corporate and politic, and shall bear the name of 17    the home county but shall be independent from and not a 18    part of the county government and shall itself be a 19    political subdivision and a unit of local government, and 20    upon appointment of the new commissioners as the governing 21    board of such water commission as provided in subsection 22    (c), such water commission shall remain responsible for 23    the full payment of, and shall by operation of law be 24    deemed to have assumed and shall pay when due all debts and 25    obligations of the commission as the same is constituted 26    and as such debts and obligations existed on the date such   SB3381 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1    water commission becomes a county water commission and 2    such additional debts and obligations as are incurred by 3    such commission after such date and prior to the 4    appointment of the new commissioners as the governing 5    board of such commission, and further shall continue to 6    have and exercise all powers and functions and duties of a 7    water commission created pursuant to Division 135 of the 8    Illinois Municipal Code, as now or hereafter amended, and 9    the county water commission may rely on that Division, as 10    modified and supplemented by the provisions of this Act, 11    as lawful authority under which it may act.12    (b) Any county water commission shall have as its 13territory within its corporate limits, subject to taxation for 14its purposes, and subject to the powers and limitations as 15conferred by this Act, (i) all of the territory of the home 16county except that territory located within the corporate 17limits of excluded units as hereinafter defined and (ii) also 18all of the territory located outside the home county and 19included within the corporate limits of an included unit as 20hereinafter defined. As used in this Act, "excluded unit" 21means a unit of local government having a waterworks system 22and having within its corporate limits territory within the 23home county and which either, at the time any commission 24becomes a county water commission, receives, or has contracted 25at such time for the receipt of, more than 25% of the water 26distributed by such unit's water system from a source outside   SB3381 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1of the home county, or a unit of local government that seeks a 2change in status as provided in this Section. As used in this 3Section, "included unit" means any unit of local government 4having a waterworks system and having within its corporate 5limits territory within the home county, which unit of local 6government is not an excluded unit. No other water commission 7shall be constituted under Division 135 of the Illinois 8Municipal Code in any home county after the effective date of 9this Act to provide water from any source located outside the 10home county. A unit of local government may switch its status 11from being an included unit to an excluded unit provided that 12(i) it has constructed a water treatment plant prior to 13December 31, 2006 to comply with United States Environmental 14Protection Agency regulations regarding radium; (ii) it 15notifies the commission in writing of its desire to become an 16excluded unit; and (iii) it no longer demands future service 17from the commission and shall not be reinstated as an included 18unit. In the event a unit of local government switches status, 19the water commission shall, from any legally available 20sources, transfer the sums collected from that unit of local 21government for the period of time beginning January 1, 2006 to 22the date that this tax is no longer assessed within the 23affected excluded unit. The transfer of funds authorized 24herein shall be made within 90 days of the effective date of 25this amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly. Except as 26authorized by a county water commission, no home county or   SB3381 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1included unit shall enter into any new or renew or extend any 2existing contract, agreement or other arrangement for the 3acquisition or sale of water from any source located outside a 4home county; provided, however, that any included unit may 5contract for a supply of water in case of a temporary emergency 6from any other unit of local government or any entity. In the 7event that any included unit elects to serve retail customers 8outside its corporate boundaries and to establish rates and 9charges for such water in excess of those charged within its 10corporate boundaries, such rates and charges shall have a 11reasonable relationship to the actual cost of providing and 12delivering the water; this provision is declarative of 13existing law. It is declared to be the law of this State 14pursuant to paragraphs (g) and (h) of Section 6 of Article VII 15of the Illinois Constitution that in any home county, the 16provisions of this Act and Division 135 of the Illinois 17Municipal Code, as modified and supplemented by this Act and 18this amendatory Act of the 93rd General Assembly, constitute a 19limitation upon the power of any such county and upon all units 20of local government (except excluded units) within such 21county, including home rule units, limiting to such county, 22units of local government and home rule units the power to 23acquire, supply or distribute water or to establish any water 24commission for such purposes involving water from any source 25located outside the home county in a manner other than as 26provided or permitted by this Act and Division 135, as   SB3381 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1modified and supplemented by this Act, and further constitute 2an exercise of exclusive State power with respect to the 3acquisition, supply and distribution of water from any source 4located outside the home county by any such county and by units 5of local government (except excluded units), including home 6rule units, within such county and with respect to the 7establishment for such purposes of any water commission 8therein, which power may not be exercised concurrently by any 9unit of local government or home rule unit. Upon the request of 10any included unit, a county water commission shall provide 11such included unit Lake Michigan water in an amount up to the 12then current Department of Transportation allocation of Lake 13Michigan water for such included unit.14    With respect to a water commission to which the provisions 15of subsection (a) apply, all uninhabited territory that is 16owned and solely occupied by such a commission and is located 17not within its home county but within a non-home rule 18municipality adjacent to its home county shall, 19notwithstanding any other provision of law, be disconnected 20from that municipality by operation of this Act on the 21effective date of this amendatory Act of 1991, and shall 22thereafter no longer be within the territory of the 23municipality for any purpose; except that for the purposes of 24any statute that requires contiguity of territory, the 25territory of the water commission shall be disregarded and the 26municipality shall not be deemed to be noncontiguous by virtue   SB3381 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1of the disconnection of the water commission territory.2    (c) The governing body of any water commission to which 3the provisions of subsection (a) apply shall be a board of 4commissioners, each to be appointed within 30 days after the 5water commission becomes a county water commission to a term 6commencing on such date, as follows: 7        (i) one commissioner, who shall serve as chairman, who 8    shall be a resident of the home county, to be appointed by 9    the chairman of the county board of such county with the 10    advice and consent of the county board, provided that 11    following the expiration of the term or vacancy of the 12    current chairman serving on the effective date of this 13    amendatory Act of the 93rd General Assembly, any 14    subsequent appointment as chairman shall also be subject 15    to the advice and consent of the county water commission; 16        (ii) one commissioner from each county board district 17    within the home county, to be appointed by the chairman of 18    the county board of the home county with the advice and 19    consent of the county board; and 20        (iii) one commissioner from each county board district 21    within the home county, to be appointed by the majority 22    vote of the mayors of those included units which are 23    municipalities and which have the greatest percentage of 24    their respective populations residing within such county 25    board district of the home county.26    The mayors of the respective county board districts shall   SB3381 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1meet for the purpose of making said respective appointments at 2a time and place designated by that mayor in each county board 3district of the included unit with the largest population 4voting for a commissioner upon not less than 10 days' written 5notice to each other mayor entitled to vote.6    The commissioners so appointed shall serve for a term of 6 7years, or until their successors have been appointed and have 8qualified in the same manner as the original appointments, 9except that at the first meeting of such commissioners, (A) 10the commissioners first appointed pursuant to paragraph (ii) 11of this subsection shall determine publicly by lot 1/3 of 12their number to serve for terms of 2 years, 1/3 of their number 13to serve for terms of 4 years and 1/3 of their number to serve 14for terms of 6 years, any odd number of commissioners so 15determined by dividing into thirds to serve 6-year 6 year 16terms, and (B) the commissioners first appointed pursuant to 17paragraph (iii) of this subsection shall determine publicly by 18lot 1/3 of their number to serve for terms of 2 years, 1/3 of 19their number to serve for terms of 4 years and 1/3 of their 20number to serve for terms of 6 years, any odd number of 21commissioners so determined by dividing into thirds to serve 226-year 6 year terms. The commissioner first appointed pursuant 23to paragraph (i) of this subsection, who shall serve as 24chairman, shall serve for a term of 6 years. Any commissioner 25may be a member of the governing board or an officer or 26employee of such county or any unit of local government within   SB3381 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1such county. A commissioner is eligible for reappointment upon 2the expiration of his term. A vacancy in the office of a 3commissioner shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired 4term by appointment and qualification as to residency in the 5same manner as the original appointment was made. Each 6commissioner shall receive the same compensation which shall 7not be more than $600 per year, except that no such 8commissioner who is a member of the governing board or an 9officer or employee of such county or any unit of local 10government within such county may receive any compensation for 11serving as a commissioner. Each commissioner may be removed by 12the appointing authority for any cause for which any other 13county or municipal officer may be removed. The county water 14commission shall determine its own rules of proceeding. A 15quorum shall be a majority of the commissioners then in 16office. All ordinances or resolutions shall be passed by not 17less than a majority of a quorum. No commissioner or employee 18of the commission, no member of the county board or other 19official elected within such county, no mayor or president or 20other member of the corporate authorities of any unit of local 21government within such county, and no employee of such county 22or any such unit of local government, shall be interested 23directly or indirectly in any contract or job of work or 24materials, or the profits thereof, or services to be performed 25for or by the commission. A violation of any of the foregoing 26provisions of this subsection is a Class C misdemeanor. A   SB3381 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1conviction is cause for the removal of a person from his office 2or employment.3    (d) Except as provided in subsection (g), subject to the 4referendum provided for in subsection (e), a county water 5commission may borrow money for corporate purposes on the 6credit of the commission, and issue general obligation bonds 7therefor, in such amounts and form and on such conditions as it 8shall prescribe, but shall not become indebted in any manner 9or for any purpose in an amount including existing 10indebtedness in the aggregate to exceed 5.75% of the aggregate 11value of the taxable property within the territorial 12boundaries of the county water commission, as equalized and 13assessed by the Department of Revenue and as most recently 14available at the time of the issue of said bonds. Before or at 15the time of incurring any indebtedness, except as provided in 16subsection (g), the commission shall provide for the 17collection of a direct annual tax, which shall be unlimited as 18to rate or amount, sufficient to pay the interest on such debt 19as it falls due and also to pay and discharge the principal 20thereof at maturity, which shall be within 40 years after the 21date of issue thereof. Such tax shall be levied upon and 22collected from all of the taxable property within the 23territory of the county water commission. Dissolution of the 24county water commission for any reason shall not relieve the 25taxable property within such territory of the county water 26commission from liability for such tax. The clerk of the   SB3381 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1commission shall file a certified copy of the resolution or 2ordinance by which such bonds are authorized to be issued and 3such tax is levied with the County Clerk of each county in 4which any of the territory of the county water commission is 5located and such filing shall constitute, without the doing of 6any other act, full and complete authority for each such 7County Clerk to extend such tax for collection upon all the 8taxable property within the territory of the county water 9commission subject to such tax in each and every year required 10sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on such bonds, 11as aforesaid, without limit as to rate or amount, and shall be 12in addition to and in excess of all other taxes authorized to 13be levied by the commission or any included unit. The general 14obligation bonds shall be issued pursuant to an ordinance or 15resolution and may be issued in one or more series, and shall 16bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times and in 17any event not more than 40 years from the date thereof, be sold 18at such price at private or public sale as determined by a 19county water commission, bear interest at such rate or rates 20such that the net effective interest rate received upon the 21sale of such bonds does not exceed the maximum rate determined 22under Section 2 of the Bond Authorization Act, which rates may 23be fixed or variable, be in such denominations, be in such 24form, either coupon or registered, carry such conversion, 25registration, and exchange privileges, be executed in such 26manner, be payable in such medium of payment at such place or   SB3381 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1places within or without the State of Illinois, be subject to 2such terms of redemption, and contain or be subject to such 3other terms as the ordinance or resolution may provide, and 4shall not be restricted by the provisions of any other terms of 5obligations of public agencies or private persons.6    (e) No issue of general obligation bonds by a county water 7commission (except bonds to refund an existing bonded 8indebtedness) shall be authorized unless the commission 9certifies the proposition of issuing such bonds to the proper 10election officials, who shall submit the proposition to the 11voters at an election in accordance with the general election 12law, and the proposition has been approved by a majority of 13those voting on the proposition.14    The proposition shall be in the form provided in Section 5 15or shall be substantially in the following form:16-------------17  Shall general obligation 18  bonds for the purpose of 19  (state purpose), in the           YES 20  sum of $....(insert amount),  ----------------------------- 21  be issued by the .........        NO 22  (insert corporate name of 23  the county water commission)? 24-------------------------------------------------------------25    (f) In order to carry out and perform its powers and 26functions and duties under the provisions of this Act and   SB3381 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1Division 135 of the Illinois Municipal Code, as modified and 2supplemented by this Act, the governing body of any county 3water commission may by ordinance levy annually upon all 4taxable property within its territory a tax at a rate not to 5exceed .005% of the value of such property, as equalized or 6assessed by the Department of Revenue for the year in which the 7levy is made. In addition, any county water commission may by 8ordinance levy upon all taxable property within its territory, 9for one year only, an additional tax for such purposes at a 10rate not to exceed .20% of the value of such property, as 11equalized or assessed by the Department of Revenue for that 12year; provided, however, that such tax may not be levied more 13than once in any county water commission.14    (g) Any county water commission shall have the power to 15borrow money, subject to the indebtedness limitation provided 16in subsection (d), from the home county or included units, in 17such amounts and in such terms as agreed by the governing 18bodies of the commission and the home county or included 19units.20    (h) No county water commission constituted pursuant to the 21Act shall engage in the retail sale or distribution of water to 22residents or customers of any municipality.23    (i) Nothing in the Section requires any municipality to 24contract with a county water commission for a supply of water.25    (j) The State of Illinois recognizes that any such 26contract for the supply of water executed by a unit of local   SB3381 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1government and a county water commission may contain terms and 2conditions intended by the parties thereto to be absolute 3conditions thereof. The State of Illinois also recognizes that 4persons may loan funds to a county water commission 5(including, without limitation, the purchase of revenue or 6general obligation bonds of such commission) in reliance upon 7the terms and conditions of any such contract for the supply of 8water. Therefore, the State of Illinois pledges and agrees to 9those parties and persons which make loans of funds to a county 10water commission that it will not impair or limit the power or 11ability of a county water commission or a unit of local 12government fully to carry out the financial obligations and 13obligation to furnish water pursuant to the terms of any 14contract for the supply of water entered into by such county 15water commission or unit of local government for the term of 16such contracts or loans. All other terms and conditions of 17such contracts and intergovernmental agreements shall be 18binding to the extent that they are not inconsistent with this 19amendatory Act of the 93rd General Assembly.20(Source: P.A. 95-114, eff. 1-1-08.) 21    (70 ILCS 3720/4.6 new)22    Sec. 4.6. Construction contracts.23    (a) All or any portion of a waterworks system or other 24public improvement of a commission, when the expense thereof 25will exceed the greater of (i) $25,000 or (ii) the amount of   SB3381 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1expense above which a work or public improvement by a 2municipality must be let to the lowest responsible bidder 3after advertising for bids under Section 8-9-1 of the Illinois 4Municipal Code, shall be constructed, maintained, or repaired 5either: (1) by a contract let to the lowest responsible bidder 6after advertising for bids, in the manner prescribed by the 7commission's bylaws, rules, and regulations and by the vote 8required as established in the water purchase and sale 9contract; or (2) without advertising for bids, if authorized 10by a vote of greater than a majority of all the commissioners 11as established in an intergovernmental agreement. The 12commission's bylaws, rules, and regulations shall provide for 13an alternative procedure for emergency procurement if an 14emergency makes it impracticable to follow the procedures in 15this subsection.16    (b) A commission may use alternative project delivery 17methods if the commission determines it to be in the 18commission's best interest for a particular project. An 19alternative project delivery method may include, without 20limitation, any design-build delivery methods or 21construction-manager-at-risk delivery methods. All notices for 22the procurement of goods, services, or work to be provided 23pursuant to an alternate delivery method shall include all 24requirements for the goods, services, or work to be procured. 25All awards of contracts or agreements for the procurement of 26goods, services, or work to be provided pursuant to an   SB3381 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1alternate delivery method shall be made on the basis of 2demonstrated competence and qualifications and with due regard 3for the principles of competitive selection. As part of an 4alternate project delivery procurement process, prior to 5submission of proposals, the commission may conduct meetings 6and exchange confidential information with proposers to 7promote understanding of the request for proposals, review 8alternative design concepts, or discuss other issues related 9to the procurement.10    (c) A commission may establish goals or requirements for 11the procurement of goods and services and for construction 12contracts to promote and encourage the continuing economic 13development of (i) businesses that are owned and operated by 14minorities, women, persons with disabilities, or veterans; 15(ii) businesses that are located within the territory of one 16or more of the municipalities that are members of the 17commission; (iii) businesses that employ persons who reside in 18the territory of one or more of the municipalities that are 19members of the commission. A commission may also establish 20other goals or requirements that result in the award to a 21responsible bidder other than the lowest responsible bidder if 22the commission determines that the award is in the 23commission's best interests, notwithstanding the requirements 24of subsection (a). Goals or requirements that are set by a 25commission that result in a preference being applied to a 26bidder or proposer, who has met those goals or requirements,   SB3381 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1in a commission's process for awarding construction contracts 2and for the procurement of goods and services must comply with 3the constitutional standards applicable to the preferences.4    (d) A customer municipality may enter into a contract for 5any portion of a waterworks system or other public improvement 6of a commission pursuant to a contracting method that is 7consistent with the requirements applicable to the 8municipality and generally consistent with the principles in 9subsection (a) or (b). The commission may accept assignment of 10such a contract and of payment obligations under that 11contract.12    (e) In connection with a contract by a commission for the 13construction of all or any portion of a waterworks system or 14other public improvement of the commission for which the 15commission issues bonds, the commission must enter into a 16project labor agreement with the applicable local building 17trades council prior to the commencement of any and all 18construction, building, renovation, demolition, or any 19material change to the structure or land.  20    (70 ILCS 3720/4.7 new)21    Sec. 4.7. Solicitation of proposals.22    (a) A commission may enter into design-build contracts. In 23addition to the requirements set forth in its local 24ordinances, when the commission elects to use the design-build 25delivery method, it must issue a notice of intent to receive   SB3381 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1proposals for the project at least 14 days before issuing the 2request for the proposal. The commission must publish the 3advance notice online on its website. The commission may 4publish the notice in construction industry publications or 5post the notice on construction industry websites. A brief 6description of the proposed procurement must be included in 7the notice. The commission must provide a copy of the request 8for proposal to any party requesting a copy.9    (b) The request for proposal shall be prepared for each 10project and must contain, without limitation, the following 11information:12        (1) The name of the commission.13        (2) A preliminary schedule for the completion of the 14    contract.15        (3) The proposed budget for the project, the source of 16    funds, and the currently available funds at the time the 17    request for proposal is submitted.18        (4) Prequalification criteria for design-build 19    entities wishing to submit proposals. The commission shall 20    include, at a minimum, its normal prequalification, 21    licensing, registration, and other requirements; however, 22    nothing precludes the use of additional prequalification 23    criteria by the commission.24        (5) Material requirements of the contract, including, 25    but not limited to, the proposed terms and conditions, 26    required performance and payment bonds, and insurance.  SB3381 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1        (6) The performance criteria.2        (7) The evaluation criteria for each phase of the 3    solicitation. Price may not be used as a factor in the 4    evaluation of Phase I proposals.5        (8) The number of entities that will be considered for 6    the technical and cost evaluation phase.7    (c) The commission may include any other relevant 8information that it chooses to supply. The design-build entity 9shall be entitled to rely upon the accuracy of this 10documentation in the development of its proposal.11    (d) The date that proposals are due must be at least 21 12calendar days after the date of the issuance of the request for 13proposal. If the cost of the project is estimated to exceed 14$12,000,000, then the proposal due date must be at least 28 15calendar days after the date of the issuance of the request for 16proposal. The commission shall include in the request for 17proposal a minimum of 30 days to develop the Phase II 18submissions after the selection of entities from the Phase I 19evaluation is completed. 20    (70 ILCS 3720/4.8 new)21    Sec. 4.8. Development of scope and performance criteria.22    (a) The commission shall develop, with the assistance of a 23licensed design professional or licensed professional 24engineer, a request for proposal, which shall include scope 25and performance criteria. The scope and performance criteria   SB3381 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1must be in sufficient detail and contain adequate information 2to reasonably apprise the qualified design-build entities of 3the commission's overall programmatic needs and goals, 4including criteria and preliminary design plans, general 5budget parameters, schedule, and delivery requirements.6    (b) Each request for proposal shall also include a 7description of the level of design to be provided in the 8proposals. This description must include the scope and type of 9renderings, drawings, and specifications that, at a minimum, 10will be required by the commission to be produced by the 11design-build entities.12    (c) The scope and performance criteria shall be prepared 13by a licensed professional engineer who is an employee of the 14commission, or the commission may contract with an independent 15licensed professional engineer or engineering firm selected 16under the Local Government Professional Services Selection Act 17to provide these services.18    (d) The design professional that prepares the scope and 19performance criteria is prohibited from participating in any 20design-build entity proposal for the project.21    (e) The design-build contract may be conditioned upon 22subsequent refinements in scope and price and may allow the 23commission to make modifications in the project scope without 24invalidating the design-build contract. 25    (70 ILCS 3720/4.9 new)  SB3381 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1    Sec. 4.9. Procedures for selection.2    (a) The commission must use a 2-phase procedure for the 3selection of the successful design-build entity. Phase I of 4the procedure will evaluate and shortlist the design-build 5entities based on qualifications, and Phase II will evaluate 6the technical and cost proposals.7    (b) The commission shall include in the request for 8proposal the evaluating factors to be used in Phase I. These 9factors are in addition to any prequalification requirements 10of design-build entities that the commission has set forth. 11Each request for proposal shall establish the relative 12importance assigned to each evaluation factor and subfactor, 13including any weighting of criteria to be employed by the 14commission. The commission must maintain a record of the 15evaluation scoring to be disclosed in event of a protest 16regarding the solicitation.17    The commission shall include the following criteria in 18every Phase I evaluation of design-build entities: (i) 19experience of personnel; (ii) successful experience with 20similar project types; (iii) financial capability; (iv) 21timeliness of past performance; (v) experience with similarly 22sized projects; (vi) successful reference checks of the firm; 23and (vii) commitment to assign personnel for the duration of 24the project and qualifications of the entity's consultants.25    The commission may include any additional relevant 26criteria in Phase I that it deems necessary for a proper   SB3381 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1qualification review. The commission may not consider any 2design-build entity for evaluation or award if the entity has 3any pecuniary interest in the project or has other 4relationships or circumstances, including, but not limited to, 5long-term leasehold, mutual performance, or development 6contracts with the commission, that may give the design-build 7entity a financial or tangible advantage over other 8design-build entities in the preparation, evaluation, or 9performance of the design-build contract or that create the 10appearance of impropriety.11    Upon completion of the qualifications evaluation, the 12commission shall create a shortlist of the most highly 13qualified design-build entities. The commission, in its 14discretion, is not required to shortlist the maximum number of 15entities as identified for Phase II evaluation, provided that 16no less than 2 design-build entities nor more than 6 are 17selected to submit Phase II proposals. The commission shall 18notify the entities selected for the shortlist in writing. 19This notification shall commence the period for the 20preparation of the Phase II technical and cost evaluations. 21The commission must allow sufficient time for the shortlist 22entities to prepare their Phase II submittals considering the 23scope and detail requested by the commission.24    (c) The commission shall include in the request for 25proposal the evaluating factors to be used in the technical 26and cost submission components of Phase II. Each request for   SB3381 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1proposal shall establish, for both the technical and cost 2submission components of Phase II, the relative importance 3assigned to each evaluation factor and subfactor, including 4any weighting of criteria to be employed by the commission. 5The commission must maintain a record of the evaluation 6scoring to be disclosed in the event of a protest regarding the 7solicitation.8    The commission shall include the following criteria in 9every Phase II technical evaluation of design-build entities: 10(i) compliance with objectives of the project; (ii) compliance 11of proposed services to the request for proposal requirements; 12(iii) quality of products or materials proposed; (iv) quality 13of design parameters; (v) design concepts; (vi) innovation in 14meeting the scope and performance criteria; and (vii) 15constructability of the proposed project. The commission may 16include any additional relevant technical evaluation factors 17it deems necessary for proper selection.18    The commission may include the following criteria in every 19Phase II cost evaluation: the total project cost; the 20construction costs; and the time of completion. The commission 21may include any additional relevant technical evaluation 22factors it deems necessary for proper selection. The total 23project cost criteria weighting factor shall not exceed 30%.24    The commission shall directly employ or retain a licensed 25professional engineer to evaluate the technical and cost 26submissions to determine if the technical submissions are in   SB3381 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1accordance with generally accepted industry standards.2    Upon completion of the technical submissions and cost 3submissions evaluation, the commission may award the 4design-build contract to the highest overall ranked entity.  5    (70 ILCS 3720/4.10 new)6    Sec. 4.10. Small projects. In any case where the total 7overall cost of the project is estimated to be less than 8$12,000,000, the commission may combine the 2-phase procedure 9for selection described in Section 10 into one combined 10procedure, provided that all the requirements of evaluation 11are performed in accordance with Section 11. 12    (70 ILCS 3720/4.11 new)13    Sec. 4.11. Submission of proposals.14    (a) Proposals must be properly identified and sealed. 15Proposals may not be reviewed until after the deadline for 16submission has passed as set forth in the request for 17proposals. All design-build entities submitting proposals 18shall be disclosed after the deadline for submission, and all 19design-build entities who are selected for Phase II evaluation 20shall also be disclosed at the time of that determination.21    (b) Proposals may include a bid bond in the form and 22security as designated in the request for proposals. Proposals 23shall also contain a separate sealed envelope with the cost 24information within the overall proposal submission. Proposals   SB3381 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1shall include a list of all design professionals and other 2entities to which any work may be subcontracted during the 3performance of the contract.4    (c) Proposals must meet all material requirements of the 5request for proposal or they may be rejected as 6non-responsive. The commission has the right to reject any and 7all proposals.8    (d) The drawings and specifications of the proposal may 9remain the property of the design-build entity.10    (e) The commission shall review the proposals for 11compliance with the performance criteria and evaluation 12factors.13    (f) Proposals may be withdrawn prior to evaluation for any 14cause. After evaluation begins by the commission, clear and 15convincing evidence of error is required for withdrawal. 16    (70 ILCS 3720/4.12 new)17    Sec. 4.12. Award; performance. The commission may award 18the contract to the highest overall ranked entity. Notice of 19award shall be made in writing. Unsuccessful entities shall 20also be notified in writing. The commission may not request a 21best and final offer after the receipt of proposals. The 22commission may negotiate with the selected design-build entity 23after award for the purpose of securing better terms than 24originally proposed, provided that the salient features of the 25request for proposal are not diminished.  SB3381 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 18851 TRT 32296 b1    A design-build entity and associated design professionals 2shall conduct themselves in accordance with the relevant laws 3of this State and the related provisions of the Illinois 4Administrative Code. 5    (70 ILCS 3720/4.13 new)6    Sec. 4.13. Applicability. Sections 4.7 through 4.12 of 7this Act shall apply notwithstanding anything to the contrary 8in Division 135 of Article 11 of the Illinois Municipal Code.